Utah statutes.
17-36-3.5.   Fiscal period -- Annual or biennial.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the fiscal period for each county
shall be an annual period beginning on January 1 of each year and ending
December 31 of the same calendar year.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the legislative body of a county may,
by ordinance, adopt for the county a fiscal period that is a biennial period
beginning January 1 and ending December 31 of the following calendar year.
(b)  Each county adopting an ordinance under Subsection (2)(a) shall
separately specify in its budget the amount of ad valorem property tax it
intends to levy and collect during both the first half and the second half of
the budget period.
(c)  Each county that adopts a fiscal period that is a biennial period under
Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  comply with Sections 59-2-912 through 59-2-926 as if it had adopted a
fiscal period that is an annual period; and
(ii)  allocate budgeted revenues and expenditures to each of the two annual
periods in the biennial budget.
(d)  The legislative body of each county that adopts a fiscal period that is a
biennial period under Subsection (2)(a) shall, within 10 days after the
adoption of the ordinance adopting the biennial period, deliver a copy of the
ordinance to the state auditor.
